North Carolina, session 2025, HB1193.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mike Clampitt
Advocacy for Marrow Education and Registration Act" or "Clampitt Act."
SECTION 2. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-12.5. Marrow Donation Awareness Month.
The month of November of each year is designated as Marrow Donation Awareness Month
in North Carolina."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 20-7.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-7.3. Availability of organ, eye, and tissue donor cards at motor vehicle offices.offices;
marrow donor registration.
(a) The Division shall make organ, eye, and tissue donor cards available to interested
individuals in each office authorized to issue drivers licenses or special identification cards. The
Division shall obtain donor cards from qualified organ, eye, or tissue procurement organizations
or tissue banks, as defined in G.S. 130A-412.4(31). The Division shall offer organ donation
information and a donor card to each applicant for a drivers license. The organ donation
information shall include the following:
(1) A statement informing the individual that federally designated organ
procurement organizations and eye banks have read-only access to the
Department-operated Organ Donor Registry website (hereafter "Donor
Registry") listing those individuals who have stated to the Division of Motor
Vehicles the individual's intent to be an organ donor and have an organ
donation symbol on the individual's drivers license or special identification
card.
(2) The type of information that will be made available on the Donor Registry.
(b) Individuals between the ages of 18 and 40 may indicate their intention to be a bone
marrow donor on an initial application for, or renewal of, a drivers license. Individuals indicating
an intention to be a bone marrow donor shall give written consent for the Division to share their
personal identifying information and contact information with the National Marrow Donor
Program. The Division shall provide that information to the National Marrow Donor Program,
so the Program can contact the individuals intending to be bone marrow donors to facilitate their
enrollment in the Program."
SECTION 3.(b) No later than July 1, 2028, the Division of Motor Vehicles shall
adopt the rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.(c) Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective July 1, 2028. The
remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.
SECTION 4.(a) In order to raise public awareness about bone marrow donation and
transplantation and encourage North Carolina residents to consider joining a bone marrow
donation registry, the Department of Health and Human Services shall make available on its
internet website a public service announcement containing medically accurate information
regarding bone marrow donation and transplantation that is sufficient to allow an individual to
make an informed decision about whether to participate in a local or national bone marrow
donation registry.
SECTION 4.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide to the
Department of Motor Vehicles an internet link to the public service announcement authorized by
subsection (a) of this section, which the Department of Motor Vehicles shall make available on
its internet website. In addition, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall broadcast the public
service announcement authorized by subsection (a) of this section on monitors at drivers license
office locations across the State.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of one hundred thousand dollars
Page 2 House Bill 1193-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to conduct a public awareness
campaign regarding Marrow Donation Awareness Month.
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
House Bill 1193-Second Edition Page 3